trunk/apertium-mk-bg/apertium-mk-bg.bg.dix
<!-- 
	Verbal morphology paradigms loosely based on 
	Ventsislav Zhechev's BA Thesis:

	 "A Finite-State Approach to the Inflectional Morphology 
	 of the Bulgarian Verb"

        Many thanks to Rosen Vladimirov for responding to questions.
-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>аАбБвВгГдДеЕжЖзЗиИйЙкКлЛмМнНоОпПрРсСтТуУфФхХцЦчЧшШщЩъЪьюЮяЯЭèѝ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"        c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"       c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="num"      c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="prn"      c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="det"      c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="pr"       c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="adj"      c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv"      c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="part"     c="Particle"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"     c="Abbreviation"/>
    <sdef n="ij"       c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"    c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"    c="Verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"  c="Verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"     c="Auxilliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"    c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="pref"     c="Prefix"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"   c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"   c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="exp"     c="Expectative"/>
    <sdef n="sbj"     c="Subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="opt"     c="Optative"/>

    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="ma"       c="Masculine (animate)"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="mfn"/>

    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="ct"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>

    <sdef n="apprx"		c="approximation form of numeral"/>

    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="acc"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="voc"/>

    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>

    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>

    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="tot"/>

    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>

    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="pers"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="qst"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="rel"     c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="neg"     c="Negative"/>
    <sdef n="clt"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>

    <sdef n="top"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="cog"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>

    <sdef n="pres"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="aor"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pp" 		c="Past (passive) participle, минало страдателно причастие, горен"	/>
    <sdef n="lp"      c="L-participle, aka past active participle минало деятелно причастие, горял, горил"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"     c="Present active participle, горящ"/>
	<sdef n="tv"       c="Transitive"/>
	<sdef n="iv"      c="Intansitive"/>
	<sdef n="perf"       c="Perfective aspect"/>
	<sdef n="imperf"      c="Imperfective aspect"/>

    <sdef n="subst"/>
    <sdef n="pass"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>


    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>

  </sdefs>
  
  <pardefs>

    <!-- Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="нул/а__num">
      <e>        <p>          <l>а</l>          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>ата</l>        <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"> <p>          <l>ата</l>        <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>и</l>          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>ите</l>        <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ед/ин__num">
      <e>        <p>          <l>ин</l>          <r>ин<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>иния</l>       <r>ин<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>иният</l>       <r>ин<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>на</l>          <r>ин<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>ната</l>        <r>ин<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>но</l>          <r>ин<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>ното</l>        <r>ин<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>ни</l>          <r>ин<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>ните</l>        <r>ин<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="дв/а__num">
      <e>        <p>          <l>а</l>          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>ата</l>        <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>ама</l>        <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>амата</l>      <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>е</l>          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>ете</l>        <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>е</l>          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>ете</l>        <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="три__num">
      <e>        <p>          <l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>те</l>        <r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>ма</l>        <r><s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>мата</l>      <r><s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="пет__num">
      <e>        <p>          <l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>те</l>        <r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>има</l>       <r><s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>имата</l>     <r><s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="сед/ем__num">
      <e>        <p>          <l>ем</l>          <r>ем<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>емте</l>        <r>ем<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>мина</l>       <r>ем<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>мината</l>     <r>ем<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="десет__num">
      <e>        <p>          <l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>те</l>        <r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>има</l>       <r><s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>имата</l>     <r><s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>ина</l>       <r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="apprx"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>ината</l>     <r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="apprx"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="нула"><i>нул</i><par n="нул/а__num"/></e>
    <e lm="един"><i>ед</i><par n="ед/ин__num"/></e>
    <e lm="два"><i>дв</i><par n="дв/а__num"/></e>
    <e lm="три"><i>три</i><par n="три__num"/></e>
    <e lm="четири"><i>четири</i><par n="три__num"/></e>
    <e lm="пет"><i>пет</i><par n="пет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="шест"><i>шест</i><par n="пет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="седем"><i>сед</i><par n="сед/ем__num"/></e>
    <e lm="осем"><i>ос</i><par n="сед/ем__num"/></e>
    <e lm="девет"><i>девет</i><par n="пет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="десет"><i>десет</i><par n="десет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="единадесет"><i>единадесет</i><par n="десет__num"/></e>
	<e lm="единадесет" r="LR"><p><l>единадесет</l><r>единайсет</r></p><par n="десет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="дванадесет"><i>дванадесет</i><par n="десет__num"/></e>
	<e lm="дванадесет" r="LR"><p><l>дванадесет</l><r>дванайсет</r></p><par n="десет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="тринадесет"><i>тринадесет</i><par n="десет__num"/></e>
	<e lm="тринадесет" r="LR"><p><l>тринадесет</l><r>тринайсет</r></p><par n="десет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="четиринадесет"><i>четиринадесет</i><par n="десет__num"/></e>
	<e lm="четиринадесет" r="LR"><p><l>четиринадесет</l><r>четиринайсет</r></p><par n="десет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="петнадесет"><i>петнадесет</i><par n="десет__num"/></e>
	<e lm="петнадесет" r="LR"><p><l>петнадесет</l><r>петнайсет</r></p><par n="десет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="шестнадесет"><i>шестнадесет</i><par n="десет__num"/></e>
	<e lm="шестнадесет" r="LR"><p><l>шестнадесет</l><r>шестнайсет</r></p><par n="десет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="седемнадесет"><i>седемнадесет</i><par n="десет__num"/></e>
	<e lm="седемнадесет" r="LR"><p><l>седемнадесет</l><r>седемнайсет</r></p><par n="десет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="осемнадесет"><i>осемнадесет</i><par n="десет__num"/></e>
	<e lm="осемнадесет" r="LR"><p><l>осемнадесет</l><r>осемнайсет</r></p><par n="десет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="деветнадесет"><i>деветнадесет</i><par n="десет__num"/></e>
	<e lm="деветнадесет" r="LR"><p><l>деветнадесет</l><r>деветнайсет</r></p><par n="десет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="двадесет"><i>двадесет</i><par n="десет__num"/></e>
	<e lm="двадесет" r="LR"><p><l>двадесет</l><r>двайсет</r></p><par n="десет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="тридесет"><i>тридесет</i><par n="десет__num"/></e>
	<e lm="тридесет" r="LR"><p><l>тридесет</l><r>трийсет</r></p><par n="десет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="четиридесет"><i>четиридесет</i><par n="десет__num"/></e>
	<e lm="четиридесет" r="LR"><p><l>четиридесет</l><r>четирийсет</r></p><par n="десет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="петдесет"><i>петдесет</i><par n="десет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="шестдесет"><i>шестдесет</i><par n="десет__num"/></e>
	<e lm="шестдесет" r="LR"><p><l>шестдесет</l><r>шейсет</r></p><par n="десет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="седемдесет"><i>седемдесет</i><par n="десет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="осемдесет"><i>осемдесет</i><par n="десет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="деветдесет"><i>деветдесет</i><par n="десет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="хиляда"><i>хиляд</i><par n="нул/а__num"/></e>
